Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 8-847, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-847. Periodic review hearings A. After the disposition hearing, the court shall hold periodic review hearings at least once every six months as required by federal law. B. At a proceeding to review the disposition orders of the court, the court shall provide the following persons notice of the review and the right to participate in the proceeding: 1. The authorized agency charged with the child's care and custody. 2. Any foster parents in whose home the child resided within the last six months or resides at present, except for those foster parents who maintain a receiving foster home where the child has resided for ten days or less.  The petitioner shall provide the court with the names and addresses of all foster parents who are entitled to notice pursuant to statute. 3. A shelter care facility or receiving foster home where the child resides or has resided within the last six months for more than ten days.  The petitioner shall provide the court with the names and addresses of all shelter care facilities and receiving foster homes that are entitled to notice pursuant to this paragraph. 4. The child's parent or guardian unless the parental rights of that parent or guardian have been terminated by court action or unless the parent has relinquished rights to the child to an agency or has consented to the adoption of the child as provided in section 8-107. 5. The child, if twelve years of age or older. 6. The child's relative, as defined in section 8-501, if that relative files a written notice of right of participation with the court. 7. A person permitted by the court to intervene as a party in the dependency proceeding. 8. A physical custodian of the child within the preceding six months. 9. Any person who has filed a petition to adopt or who has physical custody pursuant to a court order in a foster-adoptive placement. 10. Any other person as the court may direct. C. At least fifteen days before any periodic review hearing, the department shall file a fact-based report with the court and provide a copy of the report to all of the parties.  If the department's report contains advocacy or recommendations, the court shall view the report in the light most favorable to the parties that have not filed the report.  The report shall contain all of the following information: 1. The placement of the child. 2. The services being provided to the child and the child's family, including the child's educational needs. 3. The progress made in achieving the child's case plan goals. 4. Whether the child continues to be dependent. C. D. At the first periodic review hearing, the court shall consider whether a parent of a child who is under three years of age has substantially neglected or wilfully refused to participate in reunification services offered by the department. D. E. At any periodic review hearing, the court shall consider the health and safety of the child as a paramount concern. E. F. At any periodic review hearing the court shall determine: 1. Whether the department has identified and assessed placement of the child with a relative or person who has a significant relationship with the child. 2. Whether the parent or guardian has complied with the court order pursuant to section 8-824, subsection D E, paragraph 6  7 or provided the information described in section 8-842, subsection B, paragraph 1. F. G. If the court finds that a child is no longer dependent, before it dismisses the proceeding the court shall provide notice of the sibling information exchange program established pursuant to section 8-543 to the following: 1. An adult who is the former dependent child in the proceeding for whom the periodic review hearing is held. 2. A parent or guardian with legal custody of the former dependent child for whom the periodic review hearing is held. END_STATUTE